sv: Kompatibelt stridstoppssystem: Beyblade (klassisk/plastgeneration); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generisk/universell; Infinity Nado; Nado (övrigt); Övrigt
en: Compatible battle top system: Beyblade (classic/plastic generation); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generic/Universal; Infinity Nado; Nado (other); Other
zh-TW: 相容戰鬥陀螺系統: 戰鬥陀螺 (經典/塑膠世代); 戰鬥陀螺 爆烈世代; 戰鬥陀螺 鋼鐵奇兵; 戰鬥陀螺 X; 通用; Infinity Nado; Nado (其他); 其他
bg-BG: Съвместима система за бойни пумпали: Beyblade (classic/plastic generation); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Обща/Универсална; Infinity Nado; Nado (друго); Друго
pt-BR: Sistema de pião de batalha compatível: Beyblade (classic/plastic generation); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generic/Universal; Infinity Nado; Nado (other); Outro
tr: Uyumlu topaç çarpıştırma sistemi: Beyblade (klasik/plastik nesil); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Genel/Evrensel; Infinity Nado; Nado (diğer); Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém bojových spinningov: Beyblade (klasická/plastová generácia); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Všeobecné/univerzálne; Infinity Nado; Nado (iné); Iné
hr-HR: Kompatibilni sustav borbenog vrha: Beyblade (klasična/plastična generacija); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight / Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Općenito/univerzalno; Infinity Nado; Nado (ostalo); Ostalo
zh-CN: 适配战斗陀螺系统: 战斗陀螺（经典版/塑料世代）; 战斗陀螺爆裂世代 (Beyblade Burst); 战斗陀螺钢铁战魂 (Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion); 战斗陀螺 X (Beyblade X); 通用型; 飓风战魂 (Infinity Nado); 战魂（其他）; 其他
nl: Compatibel battle top-systeem: Beyblade (klassiek/plastic generatie); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generiek/universeel; Infinity Nado; Nado (overige); Overige
vi: Hệ thống mặt bàn chơi bi-a tương thích: Beyblade (cổ điển/thế hệ nhựa); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Cơ bản/phổ thông; Vòng quay vô cực; Nado (khác); Khác
fi: Yhteensopiva taisteluhyrräjärjestelmä: Beyblade (klassinen/muovisukupolvi); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Yleinen/universaali; Infinity Nado; Nado (muu); Muu
pt-PT: Sistema de Battle Top compatível: Beyblade (geração clássica/plástico); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Genérico/universal; Infinity Nado; Nado (outro); Outro
nb: Kompatibelt kampsystem: Beyblade (classic/plastic generation); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generic/Universal; Infinity Nado; Nado (other); Annet
fr: Système de toupie de combat compatible: Beyblade (classique/première génération); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Générique/Universel; Infinity Nado; Nado (autre); Autre
ko: 호환 배틀탑 시스템: 베이블레이드(클래식/플라스틱 세대); 베이블레이드 버스트; 베이블레이드 메탈 파이트/메탈 퓨전; 베이블레이드 X; 일반/범용; 인피니티 나도; 나도(기타); 기타
ja: 互換性のあるバトルトップシステム: ベイブレード (クラシック/プラスチック世代); ベイブレードバースト; ベイブレード メタルファイト/メタルフュージョン; ベイブレードX; 汎用/ユニバーサル; インフィニティ・ナド; Nado (その他); その他
ru: Совместимая система battle top: Beyblade (классическое/пластиковое поколение); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Обычная/универсальная; Infinity Nado; Nado (другие); Другое
ro-RO: Sistem de top de luptă compatibil: Beyblade (clasic/generația de plastic); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generic/Universal; Infinity Nado; Nado (altele); Altele
hu: Kompatibilis pörgettyű rendszer: Beyblade (klasszikus/műanyag generáció); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Általános / Univerzális; Infinity Nado; Nado (egyéb); Egyéb
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem za Battle Top: Beyblade (klasična/plastična generacija); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Splošno/univerzalno; Infinity Nado; Nado (drugo); Drugo
th: ระบบลูกข่างต่อสู้ที่เข้ากันได้: Beyblade (รุ่นคลาสสิก/พลาสติก); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; ทั่วไป/มาตรฐาน; Infinity Nado; Nado (อื่นๆ); อื่นๆ
pl: Kompatybilny system bączków bitewnych: Beyblade (klasyczne / generacja plastikowa); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight / Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generyczne / uniwersalne; Infinity Nado; Nado (inne); Inne
it: Sistema di top da battaglia compatibile: Beyblade (generazione classica/di plastica); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generico/Universale; Infinity Nado; Nado (altro); Altro
de: Kompatibles Battle-Top-System: Beyblade (Classic/Plastic-Generation); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generisch/Universell; Infinity Nado; Nado (sonstige); Sonstige
el: Σύστημα μάχης συμβατό με το προϊόν: Beyblade (κλασική/πλαστική γενιά); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Γενικής χρήσης; Infinity Nado; Nado (άλλο); Άλλο
es: Sistema de trompos de combate compatible: Beyblade (clásico/generación de plástico); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Genérico/universal; Infinity Nado; Nado (otro); Otro
da: Kompatibelt system til konkurrencesnurretop: Beyblade (klassisk/plastik-generation); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight/Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Generisk/universel; Infinity Nado; Nado (andet); Andet
lt-LT: Suderinama battle top sistema: Beyblade (klasikinė / plastikinė karta); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight / Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Bendrasis / universalus; Infinity Nado; Nado (kita); Kita
cs: Kompatibilní systém bojových káčí: Beyblade (klasická/plastová generace); Beyblade Burst; Beyblade Metal Fight / Metal Fusion; Beyblade X; Běžné/univerzální; Infinity Nado; Nado (ostatní); Ostatní